Luganda.aff
FLAG long
PFX VV 0 kwaalwe .
PFX VV 0 kwaaze .
PFX VV 0 kwaakwe .
PFX VV 0 kwaage .
PFX VV 0 kwaatwe .
PFX VV 0 okwaabee .
PFX VV 0 okwaagwe .
PFX VV 0 okwaagye .
PFX VV 0 okwaaze .
PFX VV 0 okwaakye .
PFX VV 0 okwaabye .
PFX VV 0 okwaalye .
PFX VV 0 okwaage .
PFX VV 0 okwaake .
PFX VV 0 okwaabwe .
PFX VV 0 okwaalwe .
PFX VV 0 okwaaze .
PFX VV 0 okwaakwe .
PFX VV 0 okwaage .
PFX VV 0 okwaatwe .
PFX VV 0 gaabee .
PFX VV 0 gaagwe .
PFX VV 0 gaagye .
PFX VV 0 gaaze .
PFX VV 0 gaakye .
PFX VV 0 gaabye .
PFX VV 0 gaalye .
PFX VV 0 gaage .
PFX VV 0 gaake .
PFX VV 0 gaabwe .
PFX VV 0 gaalwe .
PFX VV 0 gaaze .
PFX VV 0 gaakwe .
PFX VV 0 gaage .
PFX VV 0 gaatwe .
PFX VV 0 agaabee .
PFX VV 0 agaagwe .
PFX VV 0 agaagye .
PFX VV 0 agaaze .
PFX VV 0 agaakye .
PFX VV 0 agaabye .
PFX VV 0 agaalye .
PFX VV 0 agaage .
PFX VV 0 agaake .
PFX VV 0 agaabwe .
PFX VV 0 agaalwe .
PFX VV 0 agaaze .
PFX VV 0 agaakwe .
PFX VV 0 agaage .
PFX VV 0 agaatwe .
PFX VV 0 twaabee .
PFX VV 0 twaagwe .
PFX VV 0 twaagye .
PFX VV 0 twaaze .
PFX VV 0 twaakye .
PFX VV 0 twaabye .
PFX VV 0 twaalye .
PFX VV 0 twaage .
PFX VV 0 twaake .
PFX VV 0 twaabwe .
PFX VV 0 twaalwe .
PFX VV 0 twaaze .
PFX VV 0 twaakwe .
PFX VV 0 twaage .
PFX VV 0 twaatwe .
PFX VV 0 otwaabee .
PFX VV 0 otwaagwe .
PFX VV 0 otwaagye .
PFX VV 0 otwaaze .
PFX VV 0 otwaakye .
PFX VV 0 otwaabye .
PFX VV 0 otwaalye .
PFX VV 0 otwaage .
PFX VV 0 otwaake .
PFX VV 0 otwaabwe .
PFX VV 0 otwaalwe .
PFX VV 0 otwaaze .
PFX VV 0 otwaakwe .
PFX VV 0 otwaage .
PFX VV 0 otwaatwe .
